Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1920
Incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 20.